Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-148.05
Qualified Canadian Government obligations; investment.

(1) Any bank may deal in, underwrite, and purchase for its own account qualified Canadian Government obligations to the same extent that such bank may deal in, underwrite, and purchase for its own account obligations of the United States Government or general obligations of any state thereof.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Qualified Canadian Government obligation means any debt obligation which is backed by Canada or any Canadian province to a degree which is comparable to the liability of the United States Government or any state thereof for any obligation which is backed by the full faith and credit of the United States Government or any state thereof. Qualified Canadian Government obligations also includes any debt obligation of any agent of Canada or any Canadian province if:

(i) The obligation of the agent is assumed in such agent's capacity as agent for Canada or any Canadian province; and

(ii) Canada or any Canadian province, on whose behalf such agent is acting with respect to such obligation, is ultimately and unconditionally liable for such obligation; and

(b) The term Canadian province means a province of Canada and includes the Yukon Territory and the Northwest Territories and their successors.

Laws 1993, LB 423, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 48.